Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-3208
Award recipient; discontinue attendance; award termination; remit award balance.

If an award recipient discontinues attendance before the end of the award year or the award is terminated pursuant to section 85-3207, the award recipient shall remit any award balance allowable to the eligible postsecondary educational institution in accordance with such institution's withdrawal policy. The institution shall remit such award balance to the commission in accordance with such institution's refund policy.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 35.
July 1, 2023